lexicon.lexc
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iiminiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iimiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iimiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iiminiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Poss+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iim EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3PlProxPoss:iiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:iibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl+3SgProxPoss:iibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iiwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iiniban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg+3SgProxPoss:iiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlObvPoss:iiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3PlProxPoss:iiwaa EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgObvPoss:iiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg+3SgProxPoss: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Kana                                         !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary
0:%>%> NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Kana                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags
@R.Prefix.GI@ NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;
@R.Prefix.O@ NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags_Prefix=O ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Kana                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_Kana_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Kana, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other             !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Kana_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NI+Dim+Loc:aansing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Loc:ensing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+LocDist:aansikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+LocDist:ensikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc:aanzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Loc:enzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+LocDist:aanzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+LocDist:enzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl:aanzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Pl:enzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg:aanzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pej+Sg:enzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pl:aansan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pl:ensan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc:aansibaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc:ensibaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+LocDist:aansibanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+LocDist:ensibanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:aansibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:aansibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:ensibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl:ensibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg:aansiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Pret+Sg:ensiban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg:aans EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Dim+Sg:ens EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Loc:aang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+LocDist:aakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Loc:aashing EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+LocDist:aashikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Pl:aashan EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pej+Sg:aash EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pl:an EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Loc:aabaning EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+LocDist:aabanikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl:aabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Pl:aabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Pret+Sg:aaban EncliticRoot ;
+NI+Sg:a1 EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Kana                                         !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NI                                          !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Class=NI_Kana_Flags_Prefix=NI
@U.Order.Other@ NI_Class=NI_Kana_Prefix=NI_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NI, Class: NI_Kana, Prefix: NI, Order: Other               !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NI_Stems
aagimekana:aagimekan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
ajidamoo-miikana:ajidamoo-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
amiko-miikana:amiko-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
amikokana:amikokan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
asinii-miikana:asinii-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
bibooni-miikana:bibooni-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
bigii-miikana:bigii-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
biiwaabiko-miikana:biiwaabiko-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
binesiwi-miikana:binesiwi-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
bingwii-miikana:bingwii-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
gakiiwekana:gakiiwekan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
gichi-miikana:gichi-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
ishkodewidaabaanikana:ishkodewidaabaanikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
mako-miikana:mako-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
manidoo-miikana:manidoo-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
manisekana:manisekan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
miikana:miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
naadoobiikana:naadoobiikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
odaabaanikana:odaabaanikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
ozide-miikana:ozide-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
waaboozo-miikana:waaboozo-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
waasiganidaabaanikana:waasiganidaabaanikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
waawaashkeshiwi-miikana:waawaashkeshiwi-miikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
waawaashkeshiwikana:waawaashkeshiwikan NI_Class=NI_Kana_Boundary ;
